test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_A_NoExtra_pikwan_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     pikwan: pikwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1pikwan: nipikwan
     +Px2pikwan: gipikwan
     +Px3pikwan: opikwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     pikwan+Dim: pikwanens
     pikwan+Con: pikwanenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     pikwan+Pos: pikwanim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     pikwan+Pej: pikwanish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     pikwan+Pos1Pl: pikwaninaan
     pikwan+PosPl: pikwaniwaa
     pikwan+PosObv: pikwanini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     pikwan+Pret: pikwaniban
     pikwan+VocPl: pikwan***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     pikwan+Obv: pikwanan
     pikwan+Pl: pikwanag
     pikwan+Loc: pikwaning
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1pikwan+Dim: nipikwanens
     +Px1pikwan+Con: nipikwanenh
     +Px2pikwan+Dim: gipikwanens
     +Px2pikwan+Con: gipikwanenh
     +Px3pikwan+Dim: opikwanens
     +Px3pikwan+Con: opikwanenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1pikwan+Pos: nipikwanim
     +Px2pikwan+Pos: gipikwanim
     +Px3pikwan+Pos: opikwanim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1pikwan+Pej: nipikwanish
     +Px2pikwan+Pej: gipikwanish
     +Px3pikwan+Pej: opikwanish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1pikwan+Pos1Pl: nipikwaninaan
     +Px1pikwan+PosPl: nipikwaniwaa
     +Px1pikwan+PosObv: nipikwanini
     +Px2pikwan+Pos1Pl: gipikwaninaan
     +Px2pikwan+PosPl: gipikwaniwaa
     +Px2pikwan+PosObv: gipikwanini
     +Px3pikwan+Pos1Pl: opikwaninaan
     +Px3pikwan+PosPl: opikwaniwaa
     +Px3pikwan+PosObv: opikwanini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1pikwan+Pret: nipikwaniban
     +Px1pikwan+VocPl: nipikwan***idig, idog***
     +Px2pikwan+Pret: gipikwaniban
     +Px2pikwan+VocPl: gipikwan***idig, idog***
     +Px3pikwan+Pret: opikwaniban
     +Px3pikwan+VocPl: opikwan***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1pikwan+Obv: nipikwanan
     +Px1pikwan+Pl: nipikwanag
     +Px1pikwan+Loc: nipikwaning
     +Px2pikwan+Obv: gipikwanan
     +Px2pikwan+Pl: gipikwanag
     +Px2pikwan+Loc: gipikwaning
     +Px3pikwan+Obv: opikwanan
     +Px3pikwan+Pl: opikwanag
     +Px3pikwan+Loc: opikwaning
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     pikwan+Dim+Pos: pikwanensim
     pikwan+Con+Pos: pikwanenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     pikwan+Dim+Pej: pikwanensish
     pikwan+Con+Pej: pikwanenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     pikwan+Dim+Pos1Pl: pikwanensinaan
     pikwan+Dim+PosPl: pikwanensiwaa
     pikwan+Dim+PosObv: pikwanensini
     pikwan+Con+Pos1Pl: pikwanenhinaan
     pikwan+Con+PosPl: pikwanenhiwaa
     pikwan+Con+PosObv: pikwanenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     pikwan+Dim+Pret: pikwanensiban
     pikwan+Dim+VocPl: pikwanens***idig, idog***
     pikwan+Con+Pret: pikwanenhiban
     pikwan+Con+VocPl: pikwanenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     pikwan+Dim+Obv: pikwanensan
     pikwan+Dim+Pl: pikwanensag
     pikwan+Dim+Loc: pikwanensing
     pikwan+Con+Obv: pikwanenhan
     pikwan+Con+Pl: pikwanenhag
     pikwan+Con+Loc: pikwanenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     pikwan+Pos+Pej: pikwanimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl: pikwaniminaan
     pikwan+Pos+PosPl: pikwanimiwaa
     pikwan+Pos+PosObv: pikwanimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     pikwan+Pos+Pret: pikwanimiban
     pikwan+Pos+VocPl: pikwanim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     pikwan+Pos+Obv: pikwaniman
     pikwan+Pos+Pl: pikwanimag
     pikwan+Pos+Loc: pikwaniming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl: pikwanishinaan
     pikwan+Pej+PosPl: pikwanishiwaa
     pikwan+Pej+PosObv: pikwanishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     pikwan+Pej+Pret: pikwanishiban
     pikwan+Pej+VocPl: pikwanish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     pikwan+Pej+Obv: pikwanishan
     pikwan+Pej+Pl: pikwanishag
     pikwan+Pej+Loc: pikwanishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     pikwan+Pos1Pl+Pret: pikwaninaaniban
     pikwan+Pos1Pl+VocPl: pikwaninaan***idig, idog***
     pikwan+PosPl+Pret: pikwaniwaaiban
     pikwan+PosPl+VocPl: pikwaniwaa***idig, idog***
     pikwan+PosObv+Pret: pikwaniniiban
     pikwan+PosObv+VocPl: pikwanini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     pikwan+Pos1Pl+Obv: pikwaninaanan
     pikwan+Pos1Pl+Pl: pikwaninaanag
     pikwan+Pos1Pl+Loc: pikwaninaaning
     pikwan+PosPl+Obv: pikwaniwaaan
     pikwan+PosPl+Pl: pikwaniwaaag
     pikwan+PosPl+Loc: pikwaniwaaing
     pikwan+PosObv+Obv: pikwaninian
     pikwan+PosObv+Pl: pikwaniniag
     pikwan+PosObv+Loc: pikwaniniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     pikwan+Pret+Obv: pikwanibanan
     pikwan+Pret+Pl: pikwanibanag
     pikwan+Pret+Loc: pikwanibaning
     pikwan+VocPl+Obv: pikwan***idig, idog***an
     pikwan+VocPl+Pl: pikwan***idig, idog***ag
     pikwan+VocPl+Loc: pikwan***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos: nipikwanensim
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos: nipikwanenhim
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos: gipikwanensim
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos: gipikwanenhim
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos: opikwanensim
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos: opikwanenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pej: nipikwanensish
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pej: nipikwanenhish
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pej: gipikwanensish
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pej: gipikwanenhish
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pej: opikwanensish
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pej: opikwanenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pos1Pl: nipikwanensinaan
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+PosPl: nipikwanensiwaa
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+PosObv: nipikwanensini
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pos1Pl: nipikwanenhinaan
     +Px1pikwan+Con+PosPl: nipikwanenhiwaa
     +Px1pikwan+Con+PosObv: nipikwanenhini
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pos1Pl: gipikwanensinaan
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+PosPl: gipikwanensiwaa
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+PosObv: gipikwanensini
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pos1Pl: gipikwanenhinaan
     +Px2pikwan+Con+PosPl: gipikwanenhiwaa
     +Px2pikwan+Con+PosObv: gipikwanenhini
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pos1Pl: opikwanensinaan
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+PosPl: opikwanensiwaa
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+PosObv: opikwanensini
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pos1Pl: opikwanenhinaan
     +Px3pikwan+Con+PosPl: opikwanenhiwaa
     +Px3pikwan+Con+PosObv: opikwanenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pret: nipikwanensiban
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+VocPl: nipikwanens***idig, idog***
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pret: nipikwanenhiban
     +Px1pikwan+Con+VocPl: nipikwanenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pret: gipikwanensiban
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+VocPl: gipikwanens***idig, idog***
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pret: gipikwanenhiban
     +Px2pikwan+Con+VocPl: gipikwanenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pret: opikwanensiban
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+VocPl: opikwanens***idig, idog***
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pret: opikwanenhiban
     +Px3pikwan+Con+VocPl: opikwanenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Obv: nipikwanensan
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Pl: nipikwanensag
     +Px1pikwan+Dim+Loc: nipikwanensing
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Obv: nipikwanenhan
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Pl: nipikwanenhag
     +Px1pikwan+Con+Loc: nipikwanenhing
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Obv: gipikwanensan
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Pl: gipikwanensag
     +Px2pikwan+Dim+Loc: gipikwanensing
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Obv: gipikwanenhan
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Pl: gipikwanenhag
     +Px2pikwan+Con+Loc: gipikwanenhing
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Obv: opikwanensan
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Pl: opikwanensag
     +Px3pikwan+Dim+Loc: opikwanensing
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Obv: opikwanenhan
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Pl: opikwanenhag
     +Px3pikwan+Con+Loc: opikwanenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+Pej: nipikwanimish
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pej: gipikwanimish
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pej: opikwanimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl: nipikwaniminaan
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+PosPl: nipikwanimiwaa
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+PosObv: nipikwanimini
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl: gipikwaniminaan
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+PosPl: gipikwanimiwaa
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+PosObv: gipikwanimini
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pos1Pl: opikwaniminaan
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+PosPl: opikwanimiwaa
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+PosObv: opikwanimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+Pret: nipikwanimiban
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+VocPl: nipikwanim***idig, idog***
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pret: gipikwanimiban
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+VocPl: gipikwanim***idig, idog***
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pret: opikwanimiban
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+VocPl: opikwanim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+Obv: nipikwaniman
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+Pl: nipikwanimag
     +Px1pikwan+Pos+Loc: nipikwaniming
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Obv: gipikwaniman
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Pl: gipikwanimag
     +Px2pikwan+Pos+Loc: gipikwaniming
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Obv: opikwaniman
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Pl: opikwanimag
     +Px3pikwan+Pos+Loc: opikwaniming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl: nipikwanishinaan
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+PosPl: nipikwanishiwaa
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+PosObv: nipikwanishini
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl: gipikwanishinaan
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+PosPl: gipikwanishiwaa
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+PosObv: gipikwanishini
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+Pos1Pl: opikwanishinaan
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+PosPl: opikwanishiwaa
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+PosObv: opikwanishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+Pret: nipikwanishiban
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+VocPl: nipikwanish***idig, idog***
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+Pret: gipikwanishiban
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+VocPl: gipikwanish***idig, idog***
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+Pret: opikwanishiban
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+VocPl: opikwanish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+Obv: nipikwanishan
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+Pl: nipikwanishag
     +Px1pikwan+Pej+Loc: nipikwanishing
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+Obv: gipikwanishan
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+Pl: gipikwanishag
     +Px2pikwan+Pej+Loc: gipikwanishing
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+Obv: opikwanishan
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+Pl: opikwanishag
     +Px3pikwan+Pej+Loc: opikwanishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     +Px1pikwan+Pos1Pl+Pret: nipikwaninaaniban
     +Px1pikwan+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nipikwaninaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1pikwan+PosPl+Pret: nipikwaniwaaiban
     +Px1pikwan+PosPl+VocPl: nipikwaniwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1pikwan+PosObv+Pret: nipikwaniniiban
     +Px1pikwan+PosObv+VocPl: nipikwanini***idig, idog***
     +Px2pikwan+Pos1Pl+Pret: gipikwaninaaniban
     +Px2pikwan+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gipikwaninaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2pikwan+PosPl+Pret: gipikwaniwaaiban
     +Px2pikwan+PosPl+VocPl: gipikwaniwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2pikwan+PosObv+Pret: gipikwaniniiban
     +Px2pikwan+PosObv+VocPl: gipikwanini***idig, idog***
     +Px3pikwan+Pos1Pl+Pret: opikwaninaaniban
     +Px3pikwan+Pos1Pl+VocPl: opikwaninaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3pikwan+PosPl+Pret: opikwaniwaaiban
     +Px3pikwan+PosPl+VocPl: opikwaniwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3pikwan+PosObv+Pret: opikwaniniiban
     +Px3pikwan+PosObv+VocPl: opikwanini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     +Px1pikwan+Pos1Pl+Obv: nipikwaninaanan
     +Px1pikwan+Pos1Pl+Pl: nipikwaninaanag
     +Px1pikwan+Pos1Pl+Loc: nipikwaninaaning
     +Px1pikwan+PosPl+Obv: nipikwaniwaaan
     +Px1pikwan+PosPl+Pl: nipikwaniwaaag
     +Px1pikwan+PosPl+Loc: nipikwaniwaaing
     +Px1pikwan+PosObv+Obv: nipikwaninian
     +Px1pikwan+PosObv+Pl: nipikwaniniag
     +Px1pikwan+PosObv+Loc: nipikwaniniing
     +Px2pikwan+Pos1Pl+Obv: gipikwaninaanan
     +Px2pikwan+Pos1Pl+Pl: gipikwaninaanag
     +Px2pikwan+Pos1Pl+Loc: gipikwaninaaning
     +Px2pikwan+PosPl+Obv: gipikwaniwaaan
